District of Columbia statutes.
42-3506.02

Demolition.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall demolish and the Mayor shall not permit the demolition of any housing accommodation or rental unit for the purpose of constructing or expanding a hotel, motel, inn, or other transient residential accommodation.

(b)

No person shall construct or expand and the Mayor shall not permit the construction or expansion of a hotel, motel, inn, or other transient residential occupancy on the site of a housing accommodation or rental unit demolished after July 17, 1985.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 602, 32 DCR 3089

Cross References

Housing Finance Agency, exempt housing projects, displaced tenants, establishment of procedures for relocation assistance, see § 42-2703.08.
Rental housing, tenant evictions, notice to vacate, relocation assistance, see § 42-3505.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2562.

Short Title

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3501.01.

Expiration of Law

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3506.01.